Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6208
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Public Health of the Division
of Public Health of the Department
of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 758;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 652;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 8.